North Carolina, session 2025, SB927.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide two equal directed grants for operations and
community programming support to the following entities:
(1) The YMCA location commonly referred to as YMCA REACH (Resources for
Economic Development, Academics and Community Health) Center at
Winston Lake.
(2) The YMCA location commonly referred to as the Robinhood Road Family
YMCA located in Winston-Salem.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S927-v-1*